Utah statutes.
16-10a-129.   Penalty for signing false documents.
(1)  A person commits an offense if he signs a document knowing it to be false
in any material respect, with intent that the document be delivered to the
division for filing.
(2)  An offense under this section is a class A misdemeanor punishable by a
fine not to exceed $2,500.
